Washington statutes.
RCW 14.40.020

Report to the governor and the legislature.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5161-S.SL) ***

The state commercial aviation work group shall submit a progress report to the governor and the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024, and annually every July 1st thereafter. The first report of the work group shall include a list of areas that will not have further review as the areas are in conflict with the operations of a military installation.

[ 2024 c 310 s 601; 2023 c 463 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 310: "Except for section 602 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 28, 2024]." [ 2024 c 310 s 702.]